lexicons/verb_rules.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-NEUT

! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-AOR

@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>и END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гъи END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>и END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гъи END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гым END ;

@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткугъи END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткутык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}ткугъи END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}ткутык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}нин END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}н END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-FUT

@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}нтык END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%} END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гым END ;

@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткугъ%{Æ%} END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ткунтык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}мык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}тык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ӈыткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гнин END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}ӈыткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{ы%}гнин%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}ӈын%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-INTN

@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ги END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гым END ;

@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткуги END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткутык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}ӈын END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-NEUT-COND

@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ги END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гым END ;

@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткун END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткугъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}ткутык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}н END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}ӈын END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гъ%{Æ%}ӈын END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гын%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{ы%}гыткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}нин%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}н%{Æ%}т END ;
